North Carolina, session 2025, HB979.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. VOLUNTEER NURSING HOME OMBUDSMAN REPRESENTATIVES
SECTION 1. G.S. 131E-101 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-101. Definitions.
As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:
…
(3) "Community advisory committee" means a nursing home advisory committee
established for the statutory purpose of working to carry out the intent of the
Nursing Home Patients' Bill of Rights (Chapter 131E, Article 6, Part 2) in
accordance with G.S. 143B-181.1.
…
(9) "Volunteer nursing home ombudsman representative" means a volunteer
designated by the Office of the State Long-Term Ombudsman in accordance
with G.S. 131E-128 to work toward maintaining the intent of the Nursing
Home Patients' Bill of Rights (Chapter 131E, Article 6, Part 2) within the
nursing homes in this State, including nursing homes operated by hospitals
licensed under Article 5 of this Chapter."
SECTION 2. G.S. 131E-102(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) In order for a nursing home to maintain its license it shall not intentionally impede
the proper performance of the duties of a lawfully appointed community advisory committee as
set forth in G.S. 131E-128(h).designated volunteer ombudsman representative, as set forth in
G.S. 131E-128."
SECTION 3. G.S. 131E-117(12) reads as rewritten:
"(12) To present grievances and recommend changes in policies and services,
personally or through other persons or in combination with others, on the
patient's personal behalf or that of others to the facility's staff, the community
advisory committee, a volunteer ombudsman representative designated under
G.S. 131E-128, the administrator, the Department, or other persons or groups
without fear of reprisal, restraint, interference, coercion, or discrimination;"
SECTION 4. G.S. 131E-128 reads as rewritten:
*H979-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 131E-128. Nursing home advisory committees.Volunteer nursing home ombudsman
representatives.
(a) Statement of Purpose. – It is the purpose of the General Assembly that community
advisory committee members function as designated volunteer ombudsman representatives of
the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman and through their designation work to
maintain the intent of the Nursing Home Resident's Bill of Rights within the nursing homes in
this State, including nursing homes operated by hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter
131E. this Chapter. It is the further purpose of the General Assembly that the committees
volunteer ombudsman representatives promote community involvement and cooperation with
nursing homes and an integration of these homes into a system of care for the elderly.
(b) (1) A community advisory committee shall be established in each county which
Nominations and Designation. – Each board of county commissioners that has a at least one
nursing home, home operating in the county, including a nursing home operated by a hospital
licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, shall serve this Chapter, is encouraged to
nominate volunteer ombudsman representatives who are willing and able to serve all the nursing
homes in the county, county and shall work with each nursing home in for the best interest of the
persons residing in each home. In a county which has one, two, or three nursing homes, the
committee shall have five members. In a county with four or more nursing homes, the committee
shall have one additional member for each nursing home in excess of three, and may have up to
five additional members per committee at the discretion of the county commissioners.residents.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, designation as a volunteer ombudsman
representative is contingent upon designation of the nominee by the Office of the State
Long-Term Care Ombudsman in accordance with G.S. 143B-181.18. A designated volunteer
ombudsman representative is directly accountable to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman
Program in order to perform the duties as a representative of the Office of the State Long-Term
Care Ombudsman.
(2) In each county with four or more nursing homes, the committee shall establish
a subcommittee of no more than five members and no fewer than three
members from the committee for each nursing home in the county. Each
member must serve on at least one subcommittee.
(3) Boards of county commissioners are encouraged to appoint the Nursing Home
Community Advisory Committees. Of the members, a minority (not less than
one-third, but as close to one-third as possible) must be chosen from among
persons nominated by a majority of the chief administrators of nursing homes
in the county and of the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under
Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes. If the nursing
home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under
Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes fail to make a
nomination within 45 days after written notification has been sent to them by
the board of county commissioners requesting a nomination, these
appointments may be made by the board of county commissioners without
nominations.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, appointment to a nursing
home community advisory committee is contingent upon designation of the
appointee by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman in
accordance with G.S. 143B-181.18. A designated appointee is directly
accountable to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program in order to
perform the duties as a representative of the Office of the State Long-Term
Care Ombudsman. Removal of the appointee's designation by the Office of
the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman automatically rescinds the
appointment to the nursing home community advisory committee.
Page 2 House Bill 979-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Any individual who serves as a community advisory committee member must
go through the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman's certification
and designation process and meet the certification and designation
requirements in accordance with the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman
Program Policies and Procedures.
(c) Terms of Office. – Each committee member shall serve an initial term of one year.
Any person reappointed to a second or subsequent term in the same county shall serve a
three-year term. Persons who were originally nominees of nursing home chief administrators and
the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which
operate nursing homes, or who were appointed by the board of county commissioners when the
nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5
of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes failed to make nominations, may not be
reappointed without the consent of a majority of the nursing home chief administrators and the
governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate
nursing homes within the county. If the nursing home chief administrators and the governing
bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing
homes fail to approve or reject the reappointment within 45 days of being requested by the board
of county commissioners, the commissioners may reappoint the member if they so choose.person
designated as a volunteer ombudsman representative by the Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman may serve for as long as the volunteer ombudsman representative remains in
compliance with training, certification, and other applicable requirements of the Office of the
State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. Removal of the nominee's designation as a volunteer
ombudsman representative by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman
automatically rescinds the designation and ends the term of a volunteer ombudsman
representative.
(c1) List of Volunteer Ombudsman Representatives. – The names of all designated
volunteer ombudsman representatives and the dates of expiration of their terms shall be filed with
the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, which shall supply a copy of the names of
all volunteer nursing home ombudsman representatives to the Division of Health Service
Regulation.
(d) Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a person for a one-year term. Any
person replacing a member nominated by the chief administrators and the governing bodies of
the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes or a
person appointed when the chief administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed
under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes failed to make a nomination
shall be selected from among persons nominated by the administrators and the governing bodies
of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes, as
provided in subsection (b). If the county commissioners fail to appoint members to a committee,
or fail to fill a vacancy, the appointment shall be made or vacancy filled by the Office of the State
Long-Term Care Ombudsman no sooner than 45 days after the commissioners have been notified
of the appointment or vacancy if nomination or approval of the nursing home administrators and
the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which
operate nursing homes is not required. If nominations or approval of the nursing home
administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter
131E, which operate nursing homes is required, the appointment shall be made or vacancy filled
by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman no sooner than 45 days after the
commissioners have received the nomination or approval, or no sooner than 45 days after the
45-day period for action by the nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the
hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes.
(e) The committee shall elect from its members a chair, to serve a one-year term.
House Bill 979-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) Minimum Qualifications for Designation. – Each member must be person nominated
to serve as a volunteer ombudsman representative under this section is required to meet all of the
following criteria prior to being designated to serve in this capacity by the Office of the State
Long-Term Care Ombudsman:
(1) Is a resident of the county in which the committee he or she serves. No person
or
(2) Does not have a financial interest in any nursing home served by the volunteer
ombudsman representative and is not an immediate family member of a
person with a financial interest in a nursing home served by a committee, or
the volunteer.
(3) Is not an employee or governing board member or an immediate family
member of an employee or governing board member of a nursing home served
by a committee, or the volunteer.
(4) Is not an immediate family member of a patient resident in a nursing home
served by a committee may be a member of a committee. Membership on a
committee shall not be considered an office as defined in G.S. 128-1 or
G.S. 128-1.1. served by the volunteer.
(f1) County Commissioners as Volunteers. – Any county commissioner who is appointed
to the committee as a volunteer ombudsman representative shall be deemed to be serving on the
committee in an ex officio capacity.
(f2) Members of the committee No Compensation for Volunteers. – Volunteer
ombudsman representatives shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for the
amount of actual expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties. The names of the
committee members and the date of expiration of their terms shall be filed with the Office of the
State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, which shall supply a copy to the Division of Health Service
Regulation.
(g) Training, Certification, and Designation. – The Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman shall develop training requirements for certification and designation of volunteer
ombudsman representatives in accordance with 45 C.F.R. § 1324.13(c)(2). Each committee
member must receive volunteer ombudsman representative shall complete certification training
as specified by the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Policies and Procedures and be
designated as representatives a representative of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program
prior to exercising any power under subsection (h) of this section. The State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman Program shall provide the committees volunteer ombudsman representatives with
information, guidelines, training, and consultation to direct them in the performance of their
duties.
(h) Powers, Duties, and Responsibilities. – Volunteer ombudsman representatives have
the following powers, duties, and responsibilities and nursing homes shall cooperate with them
in carrying out these powers, duties, and responsibilities:
(1) Each committee shall apprise itself volunteer ombudsman representative shall
apprise himself or herself of the general conditions under which the persons
are residing in the homes, nursing homes in that county and shall work for the
best interests of the persons in the homes. This those nursing homes, which
may include assisting persons residents who have grievances a grievance with
the a nursing home and facilitating the resolution of grievances at the local
level.
(2) Each committee shall quarterly visit the nursing home it serves. For each
official quarterly visit, a majority of the committee members shall be present.
In addition, each committee may visit the nursing home it serves whenever it
deems it necessary to carry out its duties. In counties with four or more nursing
homes, the subcommittee assigned to a home shall perform the duties of the
Page 4 House Bill 979-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
committee under this subdivision, and a majority of the subcommittee
members must be present for any visit.
(3) Each member of a committee shall have volunteer ombudsman representative
has the right to enter into the facility the committee serves any nursing home
the volunteer ombudsman representative services, with prior notice to the
administrator of the facility, in order to carry out the members' his or her
responsibilities. In a county where subcommittees have been established, this
right of access shall be limited to homes served by those subcommittees to
which the member has been appointed.
(4) The committee or subcommittee Volunteer ombudsman representatives may
communicate through its chair with the Department or any other agency in
relation to the interest of any patient. resident. The identity of any complainant
or resident involved in a complaint shall not be disclosed except as permitted
under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.
(5) Each home shall cooperate with the committee as it carries out its duties.
(6) Before entering into any nursing home, the committee, subcommittee, or
member a volunteer ombudsman representative shall identify itself himself or
herself to the person present at the facility who is in charge of the facility at
that time.
(i) Privilege. – Any written communication made by a member of a nursing home
advisory committee volunteer ombudsman representative within the course and scope of the
member's volunteer's duties, as specified in G.S. 131E-128, shall be is privileged to the extent
provided in this subsection. All communication shall be considered communications by volunteer
ombudsman representatives are the property of the Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman and subject to the Office's disclosure policies. This privilege shall be is a defense
in a cause of action for libel if the member volunteer ombudsman representative was acting in
good faith and the statements or communications do not amount to intentional wrongdoing.
(j) Waiver of Qualified Immunity. – To the extent that any nursing home advisory
committee or any member thereof volunteer ombudsman representative is covered by liability
insurance, that committee or member volunteer ombudsman representative shall be deemed to
have waived the qualified immunity herein of this subsection to the extent of indemnification by
insurance."

PART II. VOLUNTEER ADULT CARE HOME OMBUDSMAN REPRESENTATIVES
SECTION 5. G.S. 131D-2.4(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) In order for an adult care home to maintain its license, it shall not hinder or interfere
with the proper performance of duty of a lawfully appointed community advisory committee,
designated volunteer ombudsman representative, as defined by G.S. 131D-31 and
G.S. 131D-32."
SECTION 6. G.S. 131D-31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131D-31. Adult care home community advisory committees.Volunteer adult care home
ombudsman representatives.
(a) Statement of Purpose. – It is the intention of the General Assembly that community
advisory committee members function as designated volunteer ombudsman representatives of
the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman and through their designation work to
maintain the intent of the Adult Care Home Residents' Bill of Rights within the licensed adult
care homes in this State. It is the further intent of the General Assembly that the committees
volunteer ombudsman representatives promote community involvement and cooperation with
adult care homes to ensure quality care for the elderly and adults with disabilities.
(b) Establishment and Appointment of Committees. Nomination and Designation. – Each
board of county commissioners that has at least one licensed adult care home operating in the
House Bill 979-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
county is encouraged to nominate volunteer ombudsman representatives who are willing and able
to serve all the adult care homes in the county, and work with each of the adult care homes for
the best interests of the residents. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, designation
as a volunteer ombudsman representative is contingent upon designation of the nominee by the
Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman in accordance with G.S. 143B-181.18. A
designated volunteer ombudsman representative is directly accountable to the State Long-Term
Care Ombudsman Program in order to perform the duties of a representative of the Office of the
State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.
(1) A community advisory committee shall be established in each county that has
at least one licensed adult care home, shall serve all the homes in the county,
and shall work with each of these homes for the best interests of the residents.
In a county that has one, two, or three adult care homes with 10 or more beds,
the committee shall have five members.
(2) In a county with four or more adult care homes with 10 or more beds, the
committee shall have one additional member for each adult care home with
10 or more beds in excess of three, and may have up to five additional
members at the discretion of the county commissioners, not to exceed a
maximum of 25 members. In each county with four or more adult care homes
with 10 or more beds, the committee shall establish a subcommittee of no
more than five members and no fewer than three members from the committee
for each adult care home in the county. Each member must serve on at least
one subcommittee.
(3) In counties with no adult care homes with 10 or more beds, the committee
shall have five members. Regardless of how many members a particular
community advisory committee is required to have, at least one member of
each committee shall be a person involved in the area of intellectual or other
developmental disabilities.
(4) The boards of county commissioners are encouraged to appoint the adult care
home community advisory committees. Of the members, a minority (not less
than one-third, but as close to one-third as possible) shall be chosen from
among persons nominated by a majority of the chief administrators of adult
care homes in the county. If the adult care home administrators fail to make a
nomination within 45 days after written notification has been sent to them
requesting a nomination, these appointments may be made without
nominations. If the county commissioners fail to appoint members to a
committee, the appointments shall be made by the Office of the State
Long-Term Care Ombudsman no sooner than 45 days after nominations have
been requested from the adult care home administrators. In making
appointments, the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman shall
follow the same appointment process as that specified for the county
commissioners.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, appointment to an adult
care home community advisory committee is contingent upon designation of
the appointee by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman in
accordance with G.S. 143B-181.18. A designated appointee is directly
accountable to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program in order to
perform the duties as a representative of the Office of the State Long-Term
Care Ombudsman. Removal of the appointee's designation by the Office of
the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman automatically rescinds the
appointment to the adult care home community advisory committee.
Page 6 House Bill 979-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Any individual who serves as a community advisory committee member must
go through the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman's certification
and designation process and meet the certification and designation
requirements in accordance with the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman
Program Policies and Procedures.
(c) Joint Nursing and Adult Care Home Community Advisory Committees. Volunteer
Ombudsman Representatives. – Appointment to the nursing home community advisory
committees shall preclude appointment to the adult care home community advisory committees
except where Designation as a volunteer ombudsman representative under G.S. 131E-128
precludes designation as a volunteer ombudsman representative under this section, unless the
Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman provides written approval to combine these
committees is obtained from the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. Where this
approval is obtained, the joint nursing and adult care home community advisory committee shall
have the membership required of nursing home community advisory committees and one
additional member for each adult care home with 10 or more beds licensed in the county. In
counties with no adult care homes with 10 or more beds, there shall be one additional member
for every four other types of adult care homes in the county. In no case shall the number of
members on the joint nursing and adult care home community advisory committee exceed 25.
Each member volunteer functions. Upon approval by the Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman, any person appointed as a joint nursing and adult care home volunteer ombudsman
representative shall exercise the their statutory rights and responsibilities of with respect to both
nursing home community advisory committees and adult care home community advisory
committees. In making appointments to this joint committee, the county commissioners shall
solicit nominations from both nursing and adult care home administrators for the appointment of
approximately (but no more than) one-third of the members.homes and adult care homes.
(c1) List of Volunteer Ombudsman Representatives. – The names of all designated
volunteer ombudsman representatives and joint nursing and adult care home volunteer
ombudsman representatives and the dates of expiration of their terms shall be filed with the
Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, which shall supply a copy of the names of all
volunteer ombudsman representatives and joint nursing and adult care home volunteer
ombudsman representatives to the Division of Health Service Regulation.
(d) Terms of Office. – Each committee member shall serve an initial term of one year.
Any person reappointed to a second or subsequent term in the same county shall serve a two-or
three-year term at the county commissioners' discretion to ensure staggered terms of
office.volunteer ombudsman representative shall serve for as long as the volunteer ombudsman
representative remains in compliance with training, certification, and other applicable
requirements of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. Removal of the nominee's
designation as a volunteer ombudsman representative by the Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman automatically rescinds the designation and ends the term of a volunteer ombudsman
representative.
(e) Vacancies. – Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a person for a one-year
term. If this vacancy is in a position filled by an appointee nominated by the chief administrators
of adult care homes within the county, then the county commissioners shall fill the vacancy from
persons nominated by a majority of the chief administrators. If the adult care home administrators
fail to make a nomination by registered mail within 45 days after written notification has been
sent to them requesting a nomination, this appointment may be made without nominations. If the
county commissioners fail to fill a vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled by the Office of the State
Long-Term Care Ombudsman no sooner than 45 days after the commissioners have been notified
of the appointment or vacancy.
(f) Officers. – The committee shall elect from its members a chair, to serve a one-year
term.
House Bill 979-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) Minimum Qualifications for Appointment. Designation. – Each member must be
nominee is required to meet all of the following criteria prior to being designated as a volunteer
ombudsman representative by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman:
(1) Is a resident of the county which the committee where he or she serves. No
person or
(2) Does not have a financial interest in any adult care home served by the
volunteer ombudsman representative and does not have an immediate family
member of a person with a financial interest in a home served by the
committee, or volunteer ombudsman representative.
(3) Is not an employee or governing board member of a home served by the
committee, or volunteer ombudsman representative.
(4) Is not an immediate family member of a resident in a home served by the
committee may be a member of that committee. volunteer ombudsman
representative.
(g1) County Commissioner Volunteers. – Any county commissioner who is appointed to
the committee serves on the committee designated as a volunteer ombudsman representative shall
serve in an ex officio capacity. Members of the committee
(g2) No Compensation for Volunteers. – Volunteer ombudsman representatives shall serve
without compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred by them in the
performance of their duties. The names of the committee members and the date of expiration of
their terms shall be filed with the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.
(h) Training, Certification, and Designation. – The Office of the State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman shall develop training requirements for certification and designation of volunteer
ombudsman representatives in accordance with 45 C.F.R. § 1324.13(c)(2). Each committee
member must receive volunteer ombudsman representative is required to complete certification
training as specified by the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Policies and Procedures
and be designated as representatives a representative of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman
Program prior to exercising any power under G.S. 131D-32. The State Long-Term Care
Ombudsman Program shall provide the committees volunteer ombudsman representatives with
information, guidelines, training, and consultation to direct them in the performance of their
duties.
(i) Privilege. – Any written communication made by a member of an adult care home
advisory committee volunteer ombudsman representative within the course and scope of the
member's volunteer's duties, as specified in G.S. 131D-32, is privileged to the extent provided in
this subsection. All communication is communications by volunteer ombudsman representatives
are the property of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman and is are subject to the
Office's disclosure policies. This privilege is a defense in a cause of action for libel if the member
volunteer ombudsman representative was acting in good faith and the his or her statements and
communications do not amount to intentional wrongdoing.
(j) Waiver of Qualified Immunity. – To the extent that any adult care home advisory
committee or any member volunteer ombudsman representative is covered by liability insurance,
that committee or member volunteer shall be deemed to have waived the qualified immunity
provided in this subsection to the extent of indemnification by insurance."
SECTION 7. G.S. 131D-32 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131D-32. Functions of volunteer adult care home community advisory
committees.ombudsman representatives.
(a) The committee shall serve as the nucleus for Volunteer adult care home ombudsman
representatives shall promote increased community involvement with adult care homes and their
residents.
(b) The committee Volunteer adult care home ombudsman representatives shall promote
community education and awareness of the needs of aging and disabled persons who reside in
Page 8 House Bill 979-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
adult care homes, and shall work towards keeping the public informed about aspects of long-term
care and the operation of adult care homes in North Carolina.
(c) The committee shall develop and recruit volunteer resources to enhance the quality
of life for adult care home residents.
(d) The committee Volunteer adult care home ombudsman representatives shall establish
linkages with the adult care home administrators and the county department of social services for
the purpose of maintaining the intent of the Adult Care Home Residents' Bill of Rights.
(e) Each committee Volunteer adult care home ombudsman representatives shall apprise
itself themselves of the general conditions under which the persons are residing in the homes,
and shall work for the best interests of the persons in the homes. This may include assisting
persons who have grievances with the home and facilitating the resolution of grievances at the
local level. The identity of any complainant or resident involved in a complaint shall not be
disclosed except as permitted under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, 42 U.S.C. §
3001 et seq. The committee Volunteer adult care home ombudsman representatives shall notify
the enforcement agency of all verified violations of the Adult Care Home Residents' Bill of
Rights.
(f) The committee or subcommittee Volunteer adult care home ombudsman
representatives may communicate through the committee chair with the Department of Health
and Human Services, the county department of social services, or any other agency in relation to
the interest of any resident.
(g) Each committee shall quarterly visit the adult care homes with 10 or more beds it
serves. For each official quarterly visit, a majority of the committee members shall be present. A
minimum of three members of the committee shall make at least one visit annually to each other
type of adult care home licensed in the county. In addition, each committee may visit the adult
care homes it serves whenever it deems it necessary to carry out its duties. In counties with
subcommittees, the subcommittee assigned to a home shall perform the duties of the committee
under this subsection, and a majority of the subcommittee members must be present for any visit.
When visits are made to group homes for developmentally disabled adults, rules concerning
confidentiality as adopted by the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities,
and Substance Abuse Services shall apply.
(h) The individual members of the committee shall With prior notice to the administrator
of an adult care home, volunteer ombudsman representatives have the right between 10:00 a.m.
and 8:00 p.m. to enter the a facility the committee he or she serves in order whenever the
volunteer ombudsman representative deems it necessary to carry out the members' his or her
responsibilities. In a county where subcommittees have been established, this right of access shall
be limited to members of the subcommittee which serves that home. A majority of the committee
or subcommittee members shall be present to enter the facility at other hours. Before entering
any adult care home, the committee or members of the committee shall identify themselves
volunteer ombudsman representative shall identify himself or herself to the person present at the
facility who is in charge of the facility at that time. When a volunteer ombudsman representative
visits a group home for developmentally disabled adults, rules concerning confidentiality as
adopted by the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse
Services apply.
(i) The committee volunteer ombudsman representative shall prepare reports as required
by the Department of Health and Human Services containing an appraisal of the problems of
adult care homes facilities as well as issues affecting long-term care in general. Copies of the
report shall be sent to the board of county commissioners, county department of social services
and the Division of Aging.
(j) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require the expenditure of any
county funds to carry out the provisions in this section."

House Bill 979-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART III. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 8. G.S. 143B-181.18 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-181.18. Office of State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program/State Ombudsman
duties.
The State Ombudsman shall perform the duties provided below:
…
(3b) Designate and refuse, suspend, or remove designation of volunteer
representatives of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman,
including any community advisory committee appointees, volunteer
ombudsman representatives designated under G.S. 131E-128 or
G.S. 131D-31 in accordance with the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman
Program Policies and Procedures.
…."
SECTION 9. G.S. 143-157.1(2) and (21) are repealed.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 10. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 10 House Bill 979-First Edition